th: ประเภทสีย้อม (ผ้าสำหรับงานเย็บปักถักร้อย): ย้อมด้วยมือ; ย้อมทับ; พิมพ์ลาย; สีพื้น/สีสม่ำเสมอ; ย้อมเป็นช่วงสี/สีเหลือบ; ไม่ย้อมสี/ธรรมชาติ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta barvila (tkanina za vezenje): Ročno barvano; Prebarvano; Tiskano; Enobarvno/enakomerno barvano; Prostorsko barvano / večbarvno; Nebarvano/naravno; Drugo
nl: Verf type (borduurstof): Handgeverfd; Overgeverfd; Bedrukt; Effen/uniforme kleuring; Space-dyed/meerkleurig; Ongeverfd/natuurlijk; Anders
de: Färbeart (Handarbeitsstoff): Handgefärbt; Überfärbt; Bedruckt; Einfarbig/Gleichmäßige Färbung; Space-Dyed/Mehrfarbig; Ungefärbt/Natur; Sonstige
ko: 염색 유형(수예용 원단): 수작업 염색; 오버다이; 프린트; 단색/균일 염색; 스페이스 다이/다색; 무염색/천연; 기타
ja: 染色タイプ（手芸用生地）: 手染め; オーバーダイ; プリント; 単色/均一染め; スペースダイ/段染め; 無染色/ナチュラル; その他
hu: Festék típusa (kézimunka-szövet): Kézzel festett; Utófestett; Nyomott; Egyszínű / egységes festésű; Space-dyed / tarka; Festetlen / natúr; Egyéb
fr: Type de teinture (tissu pour ouvrage à l’aiguille): Teint à la main; Surteint; Imprimé; Uni/teinture uniforme; Teint par espacement/Nuancé; Non teint/Naturel; Autre
fi: Värjäystyyppi (kirjontakankaat): Käsinvärjätty; Päällevärjätty; Painettu; Yksivärinen/tasainen värjäys; Pätkävärjätty/monivärinen; Värjäämätön/luonnollinen; Muu
nb: Fargestofftype (håndarbeidsstoff): Håndfarget; Overfarget; Trykt; Ensfarget/jevn farge; Seksjonsfarget/flerfarget; Ufarget/naturlig; Annet
bg-BG: Тип боядисване (тъкан за ръкоделие): Ръчно боядисани; Повторно боядисани; Щамповани; Едноцветно/равномерно боядисани; Секционно боядисани/пъстри; Небоядисани/естествени; Друго
da: Farvetype (håndarbejdsstof): Håndfarvet; Overfarvet; Trykt; Ensfarvet/ensartet farvning; Space-dyed/meleret; Ufarvet/naturlig; Andet
ru: Тип окрашивания (ткань для рукоделия): Окрашено вручную; Перекрашено; С принтом; Однотонное/равномерное окрашивание; Секционное окрашивание/пестрая; Неокрашенная/натуральная; Другое
vi: Loại thuốc nhuộm (vải thêu): Nhuộm thủ công; Nhuộm đè; In họa tiết; Nhuộm đơn sắc/đồng nhất; Nhuộm loang/loang màu; Không nhuộm/tự nhiên; Khác
cs: Typ barviva (látka na vyšívání): Ručně barvené; Přebarvované; Potištěné; Jednobarevné / rovnoměrně barvené; Sekčně barvené / žíhané; Nebarvené / přírodní; Ostatní
el: Τύπος βαφής (υφάσματα για βελονάκι/χειροτεχνία): Βαμμένο στο χέρι; Επιβαμμένο; Τυπωμένο; Μονόχρωμη/Ομοιόμορφη βαφή; Space-dyed/Ποικιλόχρωμο; Άβαφο/Φυσικό; Άλλο
es: Tipo de tinte (tela para bordado): Teñido a mano; Sobreteñido; Estampado; Tinte sólido/uniforme; Teñido por secciones/matizado; Sin teñir / natural; Otro
tr: Boya türü (nakış kumaşı): El boyaması; Üstten boyanmış; Baskılı; Düz/tek tip boya; Aralıklı boyalı/alacalı; Boyasız/doğal; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de tingimento (tecido para bordar): Tingido à mão; Sobretingido; Estampado; Tingimento sólido/uniforme; Tingido em intervalos/matizado; Sem tingimento/natural; Outro
pl: Typ barwienia tkaniny do haftu: Ręcznie barwiony; Przefarbowany (overdyed); Z nadrukiem; Jednolity kolor; Barwiony wielobarwnie; Niebarwiony / naturalny; Inny
sv: Färgtyp (handarbetstyg): Handfärgad; Överfärgad; Tryckt; Enfärgad/jämn färgning; Partifärgad/melerad; Ofärgad/naturlig; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ farbiva (látka na vyšívanie): Ručne farbené; Viacnásobne farbené; Potlačené; Jednofarebné / rovnomerné; Úsekovo farbené / pestré; Nefarbené / prírodné; Iné
it: Tipo di tintura (tessuto per ricamo): Tinto a mano; Sovratinto; Stampato; Tinta unita/uniforme; Tinto a tratti/variegato; Non tinto/naturale; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de tingimento (tecido para bordado): Tingido à mão; Sobretingido; Estampado; Tingimento sólido/uniforme; Space-dyed/mesclado; Não tingido/natural; Outro
zh-TW: 染色類型 (針線手作布料): 手工染色; 套染; 印花; 單色/均勻染色; 段染/多色斑駁; 未染色/自然色; 其他
en: Dye type (needlecraft fabric): Hand-dyed; Overdyed; Printed; Solid/Uniform dye; Space-dyed/Variegated; Undyed/Natural; Other
ro-RO: Tip de vopsea (material textil pentru lucrări realizate manual cu acul): Vopsit manual; Supravopsit; Imprimat; Vopsit uniform; Vopsit spațial/Pestriț; Nevopsit/Natural; Altele
lt-LT: Dažymo tipas (rankdarbių audinys): Dažyta rankomis; Perdažyta; Spausdinta; Vienspalvė / vienodai nudažyta; Dažyta atkarpomis / marginta; Nedažyta / natūrali; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta boje (tkanina za ručni rad): Ručno bojano; Prebojano; Tiskano; Jednobojno / ravnomjerno bojano; Prostorno bojano / šareno; Nebojano / prirodno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 染色类型（刺绣织物）: 手工染色; 套染; 印花; 纯色/均匀染色; 段染/杂色; 未染色/自然色; 其他